Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MIXTAPE STRATEGY.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Mixtape Strategy to preserve and revitalize the historic Black neighborhood of Camdentown. Money must be used to build a cultural hub at a property located at 44th Avenue North, Minneapolis, that has community gathering spaces and that focuses on fostering collaboration and innovation by empowering small, diverse businesses. new text end